Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2360XC (2) 91 da/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 668.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Notwithstanding any provision to the 3 contrary, for any pesticide registered with the United States 4 environmental protection agency under the federal Insecticide, 5 Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. Â§136 et seq., the 6 label approved by the United States environmental protection 7 agency in registering the pesticide, or a label consistent with 8 the most recent human health assessment performed under the 9 federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, or a label 10 consistent with the United States environmental protection 11 agency carcinogenicity classification for the pesticide under 12 the federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, shall 13 be sufficient to satisfy any requirements for a warning or 14 labeling regarding health or safety under chapter 206, any 15 other provision or doctrine of state law concerning the duty to 16 warn or label, or any other common law duty to warn. 17